Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2516
Board; officers; employees.

The board shall elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its representatives. The joint public agency may employ an executive director. The board shall elect a secretary who shall either be from among the representatives or the executive director. The joint public agency may employ or obtain the services of legal counsel, technical experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees as it may require and shall determine their qualifications, duties, compensation, and term of office. The board may delegate to its officers, agents, or employees such powers and duties as the board deems proper.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 16.